Hawaii statutes.
[§6D-10] Confidentiality. (a) Where
the department determines in consultation with the owner that dissemination of
knowledge of cave location or resources could be detrimental to their
protection, then the government information on the cave location and sensitive
resources shall be kept confidential.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), where an
owner still believes that dissemination of knowledge [of] cave location or
resources could be detrimental to their protection, then the department shall
keep all government information on the cave location and sensitive cave
resources confidential. [L 2002, c 241, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next